Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6376.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8. (1) Any document that would be sufficient to constitute a real estate mortgage upon on an interest in real property shall constitute constitutes a land contract mortgage upon on the vendor's or vendee's interest. (2) A land contract mortgage shall must be in a form and shall be executed, acknowledged, and recorded in the same manner as provided for real estate mortgages. (3) A land contract mortgage need not specifically identify the interest encumbered as a vendor's or vendee's interest. (4) A land contract mortgage that is recorded in the manner provided for real estate mortgages is perfected for all purposes, without filing, under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 172, 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102, 440.12501, any notice to the nonmortgaging vendor or the nonmortgaging vendee or the taking of possession of the original land contract document or otherwise. A land contract mortgage perfected in accordance with this section takes priority as a matter of law over all other mortgages, liens, security, or other interests in such vendor's or vendee's interests except those as to which a real estate mortgage would be subordinate. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.